District of Columbia statutes.
2-1403.02

Complaints; independent action by other District agencies.

Nothing in the provisions of this chapter is deemed to relieve any agency or authority of the government of the District of its obligation to take immediate and independent action regarding a matter filed with it, in accord with its jurisdiction, that also may be the subject of a complaint filed with the Office.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title III, § 302, 24 DCR 6038
1981 Ed., § 1-2542.
1973 Ed., § 6-2282.